Utah statutes.
13-28-2.   Definitions.
For the purpose of this part:
(1)  "Division" means the Division of Consumer Protection in the Department of
Commerce.
(2)  "Prize" means a gift, award, or other item or service of value.
(3) (a)  "Prize notice" means a notice given to an individual in this state
that satisfies all of the following:
(i)  is or contains a representation that the individual has been selected or
may be eligible to receive a prize; and
(ii)  conditions receipt of a prize on a payment or donation from the
individual or requires or invites the individual to make a contact to learn
how to receive the prize or to obtain other information related to the notice.
(b)  "Prize notice" does not include:
(i)  a notice given at the request of the individual; or
(ii)  a notice informing the individual that he or she has been awarded a
prize as a result of his actual prior entry in a game, drawing, sweepstakes,
or other contest if the individual is awarded the prize stated in the notice.
(4)  "Solicitor" means a person who represents to an individual that the
individual has been selected or may be eligible to receive a prize.
(5)  "Sponsor" means a person on whose behalf a solicitor gives a prize
notice.
(6)  "Verifiable retail value" of a prize means:
(a)  a price at which the solicitor or sponsor can demonstrate that a
substantial number of the prizes have been sold by a person other than the
solicitor or sponsor in the trade area in which the prize notice is given; or
(b)  if the solicitor or sponsor is unable to satisfy Subsection (6)(a), no
more than 1.5 times the amount the solicitor or sponsor paid for the prize.
